Mississippi, session 2026, HB871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 21-37-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-37-29.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the governing authorities of any municipality in this state are hereby authorized and empowered to purchase, lease or otherwise acquire, and to install and maintain parking meters for the regulation of the parking of vehicles on the municipal streets.  When such parking meters are installed and operated by any municipality, the governing authorities thereof shall have the power to prescribe, by ordinance, reasonable rules and regulations for the use and operation of same, and to provide and prescribe penalties for the violation of such rules and regulations.  Such governing authorities may also fix, prescribe, and collect fees for the use of the parking space adjacent to any such meters and to require that such fee shall be paid by the deposit of the appropriate coin or coins in such meters. (2)  With respect to a municipality having a population in excess of 145,000 according to the 2020 federal decennial census, no persons shall be charged to park on a municipal public street at any point that is adjacent to the perimeter of any real property upon which any county courthouse or other building housing any aspect of county government that provides services to the general public is now or hereafter located for such time as such persons are required to appear at the courthouse or other public building by summons, subpoena, notice or other judicial mandate, and/or for such time as is reasonably necessary to utilize the public services provided at the courthouse or other county building. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.